Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1411
Road and bridge records, who must keep; carrying capacity posted on bridges.

The county highway superintendent or some other qualified person designated by the county board shall keep in his or her office a road record which shall include a record of the proceedings in regard to the laying out, establishing, changing, or discontinuing of all roads in the county hereafter established, changed, or discontinued, and a record of the cost and maintenance of all such roads. Such person shall record in the bridge record a record of all county bridges and culverts showing number, location, and description of each, and a record of the cost of construction and maintenance of all such bridges and culverts. If the carrying capacity or weight limit of any bridge is less than the limits set forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 60-6,294, the county shall cause to be firmly posted or attached upon such bridge in a conspicuous place at each end thereof a board or metal sign showing the carrying capacity or weight which the bridge will safely carry or bear.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. I, § 11, p. 511;

Laws 2018, LB310, § 1.

Road record, duties of county clerk, see section 23-1305.

County held liable for injuries resulting from collapse of bridge where county highway superintendent failed to replace a weight limit sign. Hansmann v. County of Gosper, 207 Neb. 659, 300 N.W.2d 807 (1981).